Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202281-2237
Act, how cited.

Sections 81-2237 to 81-2264 shall be known and may be cited as the Long-Term Care Ombudsman Act.

Laws 1992, LB 677, § 1;

Laws 2018, LB903, § 2.

Adult Protective Services Act, see section 28-348.